Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-424.03
PACE provider, defined.

PACE provider means provider of services pursuant to a PACE program meeting the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 1396u-4(a)(3), as such section existed on January 1, 2020.

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 12.